Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2258
District probation officer; duties; powers.

A district probation officer shall:

(1) Conduct juvenile intake interviews and investigations in accordance with sections 43-253 and 43-260.01 and supervise delivery of preadjudication juvenile services under subdivision (1)(f) of section 43-254;

(2) Make presentence and other investigations, as may be required by law or directed by a court in which he or she is serving;

(3) Supervise probationers in accordance with the rules and regulations of the office and the directions of the sentencing court;

(4) Advise the sentencing court, in accordance with the Nebraska Probation Administration Act and such rules and regulations of the office, of violations of the conditions of probation by individual probationers;

(5) Advise the sentencing court, in accordance with the rules and regulations of the office and the direction of the court, when the situation of a probationer may require a modification of the conditions of probation or when a probationer's adjustment is such as to warrant termination of probation;

(6) Provide each probationer with a statement of the period and conditions of his or her probation;

(7) Whenever necessary, exercise the power of arrest as provided in sections 29-2266.01 and 29-2266.02 or exercise the power of temporary custody as provided in section 43-286.01;

(8) Establish procedures for the direction and guidance of deputy probation officers under his or her jurisdiction and advise such officers in regard to the most effective performance of their duties;

(9) Supervise and evaluate deputy probation officers under his or her jurisdiction;

(10) Delegate such duties and responsibilities to a deputy probation officer as he or she deems appropriate;

(11) Make such reports as required by the administrator, the judges of the probation district in which he or she serves, or the Supreme Court;

(12) Keep accurate and complete accounts of all money or property collected or received from probationers and give receipts therefor;

(13) Cooperate fully with and render all reasonable assistance to other probation officers;

(14) In counties with a population of less than twenty-five thousand people, participate in pretrial diversion programs established pursuant to sections 29-3601 to 29-3604 and juvenile pretrial diversion programs established pursuant to sections 43-260.02 to 43-260.07 as requested by judges of the probation district in which he or she serves or as requested by a county attorney and approved by the judges of the probation district in which he or she serves, except that participation in such programs shall not require appointment of additional personnel and shall be consistent with the probation officer's current caseload;

(15) Participate, at the direction of the probation administrator pursuant to an interlocal agreement which meets the requirements of section 29-2255, in non-probation-based programs and services;

(16) Perform such other duties not inconsistent with the Nebraska Probation Administration Act or the rules and regulations of the office as a court may from time to time direct; and

(17) Exercise all powers and perform all duties necessary and proper to carry out his or her responsibilities.

Laws 1971, LB 680, § 13;

Laws 1979, LB 536, § 8;

Laws 1986, LB 529, § 40;

Laws 2001, LB 451, § 4;

Laws 2003, LB 43, § 10;

Laws 2005, LB 538, § 9;

Laws 2010, LB800, § 6;

Laws 2011, LB463, § 2;

Laws 2013, LB561, § 4;

Laws 2016, LB1094, § 15;

Laws 2024, LB1051, § 3.

While performing their duties under this section, juvenile probation officers are considered to be the personnel of the separate juvenile courts they serve. In re Interest of Chad S., 263 Neb. 184, 639 N.W.2d 84 (2002).